Missouri, session 2026, HB2831.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 558.041, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 558.041, to read as follows:
558.041. 1. Any offender committed to the department of corrections, except those
persons committed pursuant to subsection 7 of section 558.016, or subsection 3 of section
566.125, [may] shall receive additional credit in terms of days spent in confinement upon
[recommendation for such credit by the offender's institutional superintendent] calculation of
such credit when the offender meets the requirements for such credit as provided in
subsections 3 and 4 of this section. Good time credit may be rescinded by the director or his
or her designee pursuant to the divisional policy issued pursuant to subsection 3 of this
section.
2. Any credit extended to an offender shall only apply to the sentence which the
offender is currently serving.
3. (1) The director of the department of corrections shall issue a policy for awarding
credit.
(2) The policy [may] shall reward an [inmate] offender who has served his or her
sentence in an orderly and peaceable manner and has taken advantage of the rehabilitation
programs available to him or her.
(3) Any major conduct violation of institutional rules [or], violation of the laws of
this state [may], parole revocation, or the accumulation of minor conduct violations
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2831 2
exceeding six within a calendar year shallresult in the loss of all [or a portion of any] prior
credit earned by the [inmate] offender pursuant to this section.
(4) The policy shall specify the programs or activities for which credit shall be
earned under this section; the criteria for determining productive participation in, or
completion of, the programs or activities; and the criteria for awarding credit.
(5) The department shall award credit between five and three hundred sixty
days, as determined by the department based on the length of the program, to any
qualifying offender who successfully:
(a) Receives a high school diploma or equivalent, college diploma, or a
vocational training certificate as provided under the department's policy;
(b) Completes an alcohol or drug abuse treatment program as provided under
the department's policy, except that alcohol and drug abuse treatment programs
ordered by the court or parole board shall not qualify;
(c) Completes one thousand hours of restorative justice; or
(d) Completes other programs as provided under the department's policy.
(6) An offender may earn a maximum of ninety days of credit in any twelve-
month period.
(7) Offenders sentenced under subsections 2 and 3 of section 558.019 shall be
eligible for good time credit. Any good time credit earned shall be subtracted from the
offender's entire sentence of imprisonment.
(8) Nothing in this section shall be construed to require that the offender be
released as a result of good time credit. The parole board in its discretion shall
determine the date of release.
4. [The department shall cause the policy to be published in the code of state
regulations] Eligible offenders may petition the department to receive credit for
programs or activities completed prior to August 28, 2026, as specified below:
(1) Eligible offenders can submit a petition from January 1, 2027, to December
31, 2027; and
(2) Offenders shall have completed the qualifying program or activity between
January 1, 2010, and August 28, 2026.

All other provisions outlined in this section shall apply retroactively to offenses
committed after December 31, 2009.
5. [No rule or portion of a rule promulgated under the authority of this chapter shall
become effective unless it has been promulgated pursuant to the provisions of section
536.024] No offender committed to the department who is sentenced to death or

HB 2831 3
sentenced to life without probation or parole shall be eligible for good time credit under
this section.
✔